Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2403
Vehicle towed
away; notification to local law enforcement agency; renotification.

Anyone towing a vehicle
away pursuant to sections 60-2401 to 60-2411 shall notify the local law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours of the license number of the vehicle. Anyone towing a vehicle away pursuant to sections 60-2401
to 60-2411 and holding the vehicle
for more than twenty-nine days shall, on the thirtieth day, renotify the local
law enforcement agency of the vehicle's
license number for the purpose of ascertaining whether the vehicle has been reported stolen or missing.
Such renotification shall be repeated each thirty days while the vehicle is held by the
tower or until such time as the tower has placed a lien on the vehicle as provided
by section 60-2404.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 3.